Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 2

Family Violence Shelters and Child Abuse Prevention Services

71-6-201. Programs established — Funding.

There are hereby established programs for the establishment and funding of family violence shelters and shelter services and child abuse prevention services. The program for the establishment of family violence shelters and shelter services shall be administered by the department of finance and administration. The program for the establishment of child abuse prevention services shall be administered by the department of children's services. Any reference to the department of human services in any existing statute, regulation, executive order, or contract relating to the administration of these programs shall be deemed to be a reference to the department that has jurisdiction over these programs pursuant to this section. This section does not change the agencies designated to receive certain reports under § 71-6-204.

Funding for such programs shall be limited to the amounts provided in the general appropriations act.

Acts 1984, ch. 930, § 1; T.C.A., §14-33-101; Acts 2002, ch. 697, § 1.

Cross-References. Runaway houses, title 37, ch. 2, part 5.

Spousal abuse, title 36, ch. 3, part 6.

Subsidized receiving homes, title 37, ch. 2, part 3.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

71-6-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Child abuse prevention services” means those services designed to prevent the occurrence of child abuse and neglect. They may include, but are not limited to:

Services relating to prevention of child abuse, such as counseling, self-help groups, hot lines and other related services; and

Community and direct education services on child abuse awareness and prevention and related topics, such as parenting, coping with family stress, child development and prenatal care;

“Family or household member” means those persons who customarily reside in the household and who are in need of temporary shelter because their lives or welfare are in danger;

“Family violence” means causing or attempting to cause bodily injury to a family or household member or placing a family or household member in fear of imminent physical harm by threat of force, regardless of age or mental functioning;

“Shelter” means a place where family violence victims and their children can seek temporary refuge twenty-four (24) hours a day and seven (7) days a week, including a program that develops and manages a system under which private homes or commercial lodgings are used as refuge for family violence victims and their children; and

“Shelter services” means counseling for family violence victims, counseling for perpetrators, advocacy for family violence victims, referral of family violence victims to other community resources, community education regarding prevention of family violence and rehabilitation of perpetrators.

Acts 1984, ch. 930, § 2; 1986, ch. 605, § 1; T.C.A., §14-33-102.

71-6-203. Administration of programs.

In administering these programs, the department with authority over each program:

Shall divide all funds received under this part equally, with fifty percent (50%) of the funds to be allocated to the department of finance and administration for family violence shelters and shelter services and fifty percent (50%) to be allocated to the department of children's services for child abuse prevention services, unless the statute or appropriations bill allocating the funds provides otherwise;

Shall, in disbursing funds received under this part for child abuse prevention services, give priority, where possible, to services for those children at risk because they reside in households where family violence occurs;

In order to assure that funds are distributed statewide, may not disburse more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) from state funds provided under this part to any one (1) shelter service or child abuse prevention service in one (1) fiscal year, unless the responsible department finds that exceeding the fifty thousand dollar ($50,000) guideline is warranted by the availability of funds, the area served by the provider, or the best interests of the citizens served by the program;

Shall accept federal funds that may be available for use in carrying out this part and may use state funds, in addition to funds generated under this part, as matching funds for federal funds if matching funds are required;

Shall assure, to the extent feasible, that any funds allocated under this part shall be used to provide services in addition to those already provided by the department;

May expend only those actual amounts reasonably necessary for administration of the funds provided under this part;

Shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, necessary to carry out the purposes of this part related to the programs under its jurisdiction. Each department may, upon recommendation of its advisory committee, establish standards for operation of the services, including establishment of a timetable for application and disbursement of funds;

Shall require an annual report from each service funded, which shall include, in addition to all information required by the department, statistics on the number of persons requesting service, the number of persons served, the type of service rendered and a description of the social and economic characteristics of the person served and the number and type of referrals, including medical, legal and education services, made to other community resources. No information contained in the report shall identify any person served or enable any person to determine the identity of such a person;

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department of children's services may require each child abuse service funded to submit certain identifying information relating solely to recipients of child abuse prevention services for the narrow purpose of tracking the effectiveness of child abuse prevention services. Such information must be maintained by the department of children's services as confidential and may not be released for any purpose. Nothing in this subdivision (8) should be construed as allowing access to any identifying information relating to family violence shelters and shelter services; and

Shall establish an advisory committee, which shall review all program criteria adopted by each department and advise the commissioner relative to the allocation of funds under this part. Such committee members will be appointed by the commissioner of the department with consent and approval of the governor. Each committee member shall be selected for a four-year term and may be selected to serve successive terms. However, the commissioner, with consent and approval of the governor, may appoint any member of the current committee previously appointed by the commissioner of human services to a new committee created by this section. Committee members shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses in attending meetings, with the travel expenses to be reimbursed in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter. These advisory committees may be made subcommittees of the social services advisory committee.

The committee on child abuse prevention services shall consist of six (6) members, including one (1) former client of the child abuse prevention service.

The committee on family violence shelters shall consist of five (5) members, one (1) of which should be a former client of the family violence shelter. At least one (1) of the members selected to serve on the committee may be chosen by the department from a list of nominees submitted by the Tennessee coalition against domestic and sexual violence.

Acts 1984, ch. 930, § 3; T.C.A., §14-33-103; Acts 1993, ch. 366, § 1; 2002, ch. 697, § 2; 2003, ch. 283, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

71-6-204. Incorporation, taxation and reporting prerequisites for receiving funds.

To receive funds under this part, organizations shall:

Be incorporated as a not-for-profit corporation, and be tax-exempt under § 501 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501); and

Comply with §§ 37-1-403 and 37-1-605 by reporting cases of suspected child abuse or neglect or child sexual abuse to the department of children's services and comply with § 71-6-103 by reporting suspected cases of adult abuse, sexual abuse, neglect or exploitation to the department of human services.

Acts 1984, ch. 930, § 4; T.C.A., §14-33-104; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 183.

71-6-205. Prerequisites to receiving funds for shelters or shelter services.

To receive funds under this part for family violence shelter services or shelters, or both, all applicants shall show that they have provided shelter services for at least six (6) months prior to the application for funds under this part, and that the funds provided under this part will enable them to establish or maintain a shelter for victims of family violence within a defined timetable, in addition to any other services provided as described in the standards promulgated under §71-6-203(7).

Acts 1984, ch. 930, § 5; T.C.A., §14-33-105.

71-6-206. Prerequisites to receiving funds for child abuse prevention services.

To receive funds under this part for child abuse prevention services, all applicants shall show that the funds provided under this part will enable them to provide some of the following services:

Counseling for the prevention of child abuse;

Child abuse prevention self-help groups;

Child abuse prevention hot lines;

Community and direct education services on child abuse awareness; and

Prevention and related topics, such as parenting, coping with family stress, child development and prenatal care.

Acts 1984, ch. 930, § 6; T.C.A., §14-33-106.

71-6-207. Legislative intent.

It is the legislative intent that in providing services to family violence victims that shelter services be provided to male children twelve (12) to eighteen (18) years of age to the maximum extent feasible.

Acts 1984, ch. 930, § 8; T.C.A., §14-33-107.

71-6-208. Shelter locations privileged — Service of papers or process.

No person can be compelled to provide testimony or documentary evidence in a criminal, civil or administrative proceeding that would identify the address or location of a shelter.

In any proceeding involving a shelter or a person staying at a shelter, the sheriff, constable or other person serving any legal papers or process shall serve any such legal papers or process by contacting the shelter by telephone and making arrangements for service of the papers or process on the shelter or the person staying at the shelter.

Acts 1993, ch. 484, § 3; 2001, ch. 198, § 1.